Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-1515
Numerical index; instrument; certificate of entry.

After such instrument has been so indexed the register of deeds shall endorse on said instrument a certificate showing that the same has been indexed as herein required, and shall thereafter record said instrument as provided by law.

Laws 1885, c. 41, § 9, p. 223;

Laws 1887, c. 30, § 11, p. 367;

R.S.1913, § 5630;

C.S.1922, § 4957;

C.S.1929, § 26-1215;

R.S.1943, § 23-1515.

Certificate of filing signed by one purporting to be register of deeds or deputy is prima facie proof that document is filed. Smith Bros. v. Woodward, 94 Neb. 298, 143 N.W. 196 (1913).